GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/map_xip.xfst
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Xerox Research Center Europe - Grenoble
#
# Copyright (C)  Xerox Corporation
#
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	mappings for XIP added to lookup output
# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller
# DATE:		27-Jul-2005
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# USAGE: 	fst -s multichars.fst -l [ThisFile]
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

# NOTES:
# -  XIP requires the following input format:
#	word <tab> lemma <tab> tags
#    where tags must start with a "+" and must not be mixed with normal characters
# - tags are interpreted from left to right,
#   derivational tags must therefore be removed or renamed

define SIG

read regex SIG & [ %+ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define MORTAG

read regex SIG & [ %^ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define MARKER

define TAG	[ MORTAG ] - [] ;


# derivation markers
define DRV   "^{" | "^}" | "^]"  ;
define SEP   "^=" ;
define CPD   ["^#" | "^-" ];


define CONVADJ 	%+Adj [%+Pos|%+Comp|%+Sup] "^]" ;
define CONVVERB	%+Verb [%+PPast | %+PPres ] "^]" ;
define CONVINF	%+Inf  "^]" ;

define CONVTAG	[ %+convAdj | %+convVerb | %+convInf ];


read regex [
# add derivational tags
     [..] -> %+convAdj		|| CONVADJ _
.o.  [..] -> %+convVerb 	|| CONVVERB _
.o.  [..] -> %+convInf  	|| CONVINF _

# remove any tag before derivation marker and compound boundary
.o.   [CONVTAG|MORTAG] -> 0  || _ $[ DRV | CPD | SEP ]

# compound categories
.o.  	%+Verb -> %+CVerb,
	%+Noun -> %+CNoun,
	%+Prop -> %+CProp,
	%+Adj -> %+CAdv,
	%+Pref -> %+Trunc
		|| _ $%+Cpd


# change boundary symbols
#.o. "^]" ->  %+derivConv
#.o. "^}" ->  %+derivSuff


.o. "^]" ->  0
.o. "^}" ->  %^ %}

.o. "^{" ->  %^ %{
.o. "^=" ->  %^ %=
.o. "^/" ->  %^ %/
.o. "^#" ->  %^ %#
.o. "^-" ->  %^ %-

.o. "^|" -> 0
.o. "[*" ->  0
.o. "*]" ->  0
 

# add a plus before other markers
.o.   [..] -> %+ || $[ TAG ] _ MARKER



].i ;
